Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.900.102

Severability—1990 c 33.

If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

[ 1990 c 33 s 603.]